Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [477A.0135] POST-CERTIFICATION ADJUSTMENTS FOR LOBBYING EXPENSES. new text end new text begin The amount of county program aid certified to each county under section 477A.0124, and the amount of local government aid certified to each city under section 477A.013, subdivision 9, and to each town under section 477A.013, subdivision 1, is reduced for each payable year by the amount of lobbying expenditures reported by or for the local government under section 6.76. No county's, city's, or town's aid may be reduced to less than zero. For purposes of this section, "lobbying expenditures" includes the amount reported directly by the local government under section 6.76, paragraph (a), plus the amount reported as lobbying expenses as a portion of dues paid by that local government to all associations of local governments reporting under section 6.76, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aids payable in calendar year 2026 and thereafter. new text end